Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.030

Area which may be included—Resolution of governing body of city or town.

A park and recreation district may include any unincorporated area in the state and, when any part of the proposed district lies within the corporate limits of any city or town, said petition shall be accompanied by a certified copy of a resolution of the governing body of said city or town, approving inclusion of the area within the corporate limits of the city or town.

[ 1969 c 26 s 3; 1967 c 63 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.030. Prior: 1961 c 272 s 3; 1959 c 304 s 3; 1957 c 58 s 3.]